Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3508
Personal supervision by a physician, defined.

Personal supervision by a physician means the physical attendance of a physician in the room during the performance of a surgical procedure.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 8.